Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 8.1 Refunding Bond Authority
35-8.1-12.
Receipt, investment, and application by state of loan.

Other than as provided in subsection (b), the proceeds of a loan to the state shall, upon their receipt, be paid by the general treasurer immediately to the paying agent or other suitable trustee for the 1984 and 1985 bonds and the paying agent or trustee shall hold the proceeds in trust until they are applied to pay the 1984 and 1985 bonds. Neither the governor nor the general treasurer or any other official of the state or trustee for the 1984 and 1985 bonds shall make or permit to be made any expenditures for new capital improvements from the proceeds of the loan. While the proceeds are held in trust, they may be invested in obligations of the United States or the state or any other state.

The proceeds generated for refinancing the pension obligation shall be paid to the general treasurer on behalf of the state, who shall then immediately remit the proceeds to the state retirement system. Neither the governor nor the general treasurer or any other official of the state shall make any expenditures for new capital improvements from the proceeds. While the proceeds are held by the state retirement system they shall be invested pursuant to the investment statutes and policies of the state investment commission.

The board, with the approval of the governor, shall have the authority to appoint a paying agent or other suitable trustee for the 1984-1985 bonds and the governor is authorized to execute any documents or agreements on behalf of the state necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Any proceeds issued pursuant to §

35-8.1-13(d)

, can be used in accordance within the terms of any trust or agreement entered into by the authority in connection with such bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 4.

35-8.1-13.
Bonds of the authority — Issuance — Purposes.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of bonds upon the request of the governor and a finding of a financial benefit to the state, in such principal amounts as it shall deem necessary to provide funds for the purposes of:

Loaning money to the state to provide funds to pay, redeem, or retire:

All or a part of the 1984 and 1985 bonds; or

A portion of the unfunded liability of the state retirement system not to exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000); provided, that the authority conferred hereby, as it relates to the refunded liability of the state retirement system, shall expire on June 30, 1995;

Funding or refunding the principal of, or interest or redemption premium on, any bonds issued by it, whether the bonds or interest to be paid, funded, or refunded have or have not become due or are subject to redemption prior to maturity in accordance with their terms;

Establishing or increasing reserves to secure or to pay such bonds or interest thereon as are reasonably required and permitted by law; and

Paying all other costs or expenses of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.

In the event that the authority issues refunding bonds pursuant to subsection (a)(2), the proceeds of the refunding bonds may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of the outstanding bonds either at their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending that application, be placed in escrow with a suitable trustee. While the proceeds are held in trust, they may be invested in obligations of the United States or the state or any other state.

If the authority shall deposit the proceeds of refunding bonds with a suitable trustee in such an amount that, when invested in and combined with income expected to be derived from obligations of the United States or the state or any other state, are sufficient to pay all principal, interest, and premium, if any, on any of its outstanding bonds, then, until the outstanding bonds are called for prepayment or otherwise paid, the outstanding bonds shall not be considered debts of the authority, for any purpose, from the date of deposit of the moneys with the trustee.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) — (c) above, (1) with the consent of both the governor and the general assembly the authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or a part of the cost of any one or more projects, the construction or acquisition of which is authorized by this chapter. The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for the payment. The bonds of each issue pursuant to this subsection shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as the authority shall determine, payable semi-annually, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds shall be signed by the chairperson of the authority or shall bear his or her facsimile signature, and the official seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof shall be impressed or imprinted thereon and attested by the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairperson of the authority. In case any officer whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and, sufficient for all purposes, the same as if he or she had remained in office until the delivery. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

(2)

The proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to subsection (d) shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or projects for which the bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for the bonds or may be applied to the payment of the cost of any project thereafter financed under the provisions of subsection (d).

(3)

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this subsection without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter.

(4)

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received and may convey or mortgage any project or any part thereof or any combination of projects or parts hereof. The trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of the law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds shall have been authorized, the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. The trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, the trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the authority’s cost of operation and maintenance.

(5)

The authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this subsection, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon or any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption purchase or maturity of the bonds. The proceeds of bonds or notes issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of the outstanding bonds or notes either on their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending the application, be placed in escrow. Any escrowed proceeds may be invested and reinvested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States of America, or in certificates of deposit, time deposits, or repurchase agreements fully secured or guaranteed by the state or the United States, or an instrumentality of either, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds and notes to be so refunded. The interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on any investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be so refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the authority for use by it in furtherance of its purposes. The issuance of the bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter insofar as the same may be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 2, § 4.

35-8.1-14.
Negotiability of bonds.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, bonds issued under this chapter are fully negotiable for all purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-15.
Form of bonds.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable from such sources, in such medium of payment, at such place or places within or without the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as the authority shall determine. The rate or rates of interest on the bonds may be fixed or variable. Variable rates shall be determined in the manner and in accordance with the procedures established by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. Bonds bearing a variable rate of interest may be converted to bonds bearing a fixed rate of interest to the extent and in the manner determined by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The interest on bonds may be payable semiannually or annually or at any other interval as may be provided by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds, or the interest may be compounded and paid at maturity or at any other times as may be specified by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds.

In case any person whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or she had remained in office until delivery. The bonds may be issued in coupon form or in any form permitted by chapter 13 of this title, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon form bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon form bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon form bonds. The authority may sell these bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

The authority may, if it deems it desirable to do so, cause the bonds to conform to any requirements imposed to exempt the interest paid on the bonds from federal income taxation.

The proceeds of the bonds shall be loaned to the state and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the loan and trust agreement mentioned in §

35-8.1-16

securing the bonds. Any surplus proceeds may be used to repurchase bonds of the authority, may be deposited to the credit of any reserve fund for the bonds, or may be used for any other purpose of the authority consistent herewith.

Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this chapter. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the authority shall be subject to chapter 10.1 of title 42 (Public Finance Management Board).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-16.
Loan and trust agreement.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a loan and trust agreement by and between the (1) authority, the state, and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state; or (2) the authority, the state and the state retirement system. The loan and trust agreement, or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds, may pledge or assign the revenues of the authority and may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues of the authority to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. The loan and trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, if applicable, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 16, § 1.

35-8.1-17.
Bonds neither debt of or pledge of credit by state or subdivisions.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the state or any other political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any other political subdivision thereof, but shall be payable solely from the funds provided therefrom from revenues. Each bond must contain on its face a statement to the effect that the authority is obligated to pay the principal thereof and the interest thereon only from revenues or funds of the authority and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state is pledged to the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds.

Except as may be otherwise expressly provided in this chapter or by the authority, every issue of bonds of the authority shall be general obligations of the authority payable out of any revenues or funds of the authority. Bonds may additionally be secured by a pledge of any grants, subsidies, contributions, funds, or moneys from the United States or the state or any governmental unit or any person, firm, or corporation, or a pledge of any income or revenues, funds, or money of the authority from any source whatsoever.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-18.
Revenues.

The authority has the power to fix and collect from time to time, subject to the provisions of this chapter, schedules for the repayment of any loan to the state in order to generate revenues. The schedules for repayment shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state. The revenues derived from loan repayments may be pledged as provided in any loan and trust agreement or resolution of the authority. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any loan and trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of revenues shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the loan and trust agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-19.
Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the loan and trust agreement securing the bonds. The authority shall, in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the loan and trust agreement securing the bonds, provide for the payment of proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues to be received to a trustee, which shall be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, which shall act as trustee of the funds, and which shall hold and apply the funds to the purposes of this chapter, subject to such regulations as this chapter and the resolution or loan and trust agreement may provide.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-20.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any coupons appertaining thereto and the trustee under the loan and trust agreement or the resolution, except to the extent the rights given in this chapter may be restricted by the loan and trust agreement or the resolution, may, by civil action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted under this chapter or under the loan and trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the loan and trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collection of revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-21.
Exemptions from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state and for the facilitation of the conduct of their public business, and will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions. Therefore, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon any income it may receive, and the bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof), shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting estate taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-22.
Bonds constitute legal investment.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this chapter are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-23.
State’s pledge not to limit or alter authority’s powers.

The state pledges to and agrees with any person, firm, or corporation, or federal agency subscribing to or acquiring the bonds to be issued by the authority that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority until all bonds at any time issued, together with the interest thereon, are fully met and discharged. The state further pledges to and agrees with the United States and any other federal agency that, in the event that any federal agency shall contribute any funds to the authority, the state will not alter or limit the rights and powers of the authority in any manner which would be inconsistent with the due performance of any agreements between the authority and the federal agency and the authority shall continue to have and may exercise all powers granted in this chapter, so long as these powers shall be necessary or desirable for the carrying out of the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-24.
Personal liability on bonds.

Neither the members of the board nor any person executing bonds issued under this chapter are liable personally on the bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-25.
Transfer of authority’s funds and property upon dissolution.

If the authority shall be dissolved, all funds of the authority, not required for the payment of bonds or other debts of the authority, the disposition of which is not otherwise governed by contracts to which the authority may be party, shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state, and, except as provided in this chapter, all property belonging to the authority shall be vested in the state and delivered to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-26.
Chapter controlling over inconsistent provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special, or local, or of any rule or regulation of the state or municipality, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-27.
Applicability of other laws.

This chapter shall be construed to provide a complete additional and alternative method for doing the things authorized hereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and in addition to the powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of all bonds of the authority under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other statute applicable to the issuance of bonds. No proceedings or notice of approval shall be required for the issuance by the authority of any bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-28.
Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.

35-8.1-29.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of that court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 12, § 1.